Washington statutes.
RCW 27.12.020

Policy of state.

It is hereby declared to be the policy of the state, as a part of its provision for public education, to promote the establishment and development of public library service throughout its various subdivisions.

[ 1935 c 119 s 1; RRS s 8226-1. FORMER PART OF SECTION: 1941 c 65 s 2; 1935 c 119 s 3; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 8226-3 now codified as RCW 27.12.025.]